Utah statutes.
77-22-4.   Investigation records to be filed with court.
In all investigations under Section 77-22-2, the attorney general, county
attorney, or district attorney shall maintain and file with the district court
the following records of the criminal investigation, unless otherwise ordered
by the court:
(1)  a copy of the good cause statement and application for the authorization
of the criminal investigation;
(2)  a copy of all motions made to the court by the attorney general, the
county attorney, or the district attorney;
(3)  a copy of all court orders;
(4)  a copy of all subpoenas issued;
(5)  detailed descriptions of all documents and other evidence produced in
response to subpoenas;
(6)  a copy of all transcripts of testimony taken pursuant to the subpoena;
and
(7)  a copy of all written communications between the court and the attorney
general, county attorney, or district attorney, and staff.
